Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2805.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 39-31-4, 39-31-5, 39-31-6 and 39-31-7 of the General Laws in
Chapter 39-31 entitled "Affordable Clean Energy Security Act" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
39-31-4. Regional energy planning.
(a) Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, and utilizing regional stakeholder
processes where appropriate, the office of energy resources, in consultation and coordination with
the division of public utilities and carriers and the public utility company that provides electric
distribution as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12) as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(17), is
authorized to:
(1) Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive
solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that
would allow for the reliable transmission of nuclear power and/or large- or small-scale domestic or
international hydroelectric power to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode
Island and its ratepayers, and such solicitations may be issued by the New England States
Committee on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes
of this chapter;
(2) Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive
solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that

would allow for the reliable transmission of eligible renewable energy resources, including offshore
wind, as defined by § 39-26-5(a), to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode
Island and its ratepayers, and the solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee
on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this
chapter; and
(3) Participate in the development and issuance of regional or multistate competitive
solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure
and capacity that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers by strengthening energy
system reliability and security and, in doing so, potentially mitigate energy price volatility that
threatens the economic vitality and competitiveness of Rhode Island residents and businesses. The
solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or
natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter; and the solicitations may
request proposals that are priced in increments to allow for the evaluation of project costs and
benefits associated with adding various levels of additional, natural gas pipeline capacity into New
England and assist with the optimization of energy system reliability, economic, and other benefits
consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(4) As part of any such state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation processes
conducted pursuant to this chapter, the office of energy resources shall work jointly with the
division of public utilities and carriers, and with the electric distribution company as appropriate,
to identify incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity and/or electric-
transmission projects that optimize energy reliability, economic, environmental, and ratepayer
impacts for Rhode Island, consistent with the legislative findings and purpose of this chapter. The
office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall be authorized to utilize
expert consultants, as needed, to assist in any state, regional, multistate, or state-level determination
related to the procurement activities identified in § 39-31-5.
(b) Prior to any binding commitments being made by any agencies of the state, the electric
distribution company, or any other entity that would result in costs being incurred directly, or
indirectly, by Rhode Island electric and/or gas consumers through distribution or commodity rates,
the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall jointly file any
energy infrastructure project recommendation(s) with the public utilities commission and may
make such filing jointly with the electric or natural gas distribution company as appropriate. The
public utilities commission shall consider any such recommendation(s) as specified under § 39-31-
7.
(c) A copy of the filing made under subsection (b) of this section shall be provided to the
LC005656 - Page 2 of 10

governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the department of environmental
management, and the commerce corporation.
(d) The electric distribution company shall be provided with a copy of any filing made
under this section at least ten (10) business days in advance of its filing with the public utilities
commission and the electric or gas distribution utility may file separate comments when the filing
is made.
(e) As part of any office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers
filing made pursuant to this chapter, the agencies shall identify the expected energy reliability,
energy security, and ratepayer impacts that are expected to result from commitments being made
in connection with the proposed project(s).
(f) The office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers reserve the
right to determine that energy infrastructure projects submitted in any state, regional, or multistate
competitive solicitation process are not in Rhode Island’s energy reliability, energy security, and/or
ratepayer interests, and shall make such findings available to the governor, the president of the
senate, and the speaker of the house. The electric or gas distribution utility may attach a separate
opinion to those findings, at its election.
39-31-5. State and regional energy procurement.
(a) Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the public utility company that provides
electric distribution as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12), as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-
2(a)(17), in consultation with the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and
carriers is authorized to voluntarily participate in state, multistate, or regional efforts to:
(1) Procure domestic or international large-scale hydroelectric power, nuclear power, and
eligible renewable energy resources, as defined by § 39-26-5(a), on behalf of electric ratepayers;
(2) Procure incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity into New England
to help strengthen energy system reliability and facilitate the economic interests of the state and its
ratepayers;
(3) Support the development and filing of necessary tariffs and other appropriate cost-
recovery mechanisms that allocate the costs of new, electric-transmission and natural-gas-pipeline
infrastructure and capacity projects selected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to ratepayers,
such that costs are shared among participating states in an equitable manner; and
(4) To the extent that the public utility company that provides electric distribution as
defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12), as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(17), pursues the
objectives identified above, the public utility company shall utilize appropriate, competitive
processes, and maintain compliance with applicable federal and state siting laws.
LC005656 - Page 3 of 10

(b) Any procurement authorized under this section shall be commercially reasonable.
39-31-6. Utility filings with the public utilities commission.
(a) Pursuant to the procurement activities in § 39-31-5 or § 39-31-10, the public utility
company that provides electric distribution as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12), as well the public utilities
that distribute natural gas as provided by § 39-1-2(a)(20), are authorized to voluntarily file
proposals with the public utilities commission for approval to implement these policies and achieve
the purposes of this chapter. The company’s proposals may include, but are not limited to, the
following authorizations:
(1) Subject to review and approval of the commission, to enter into long-term contracts
through appropriate competitive processes for large-scale hydroelectric power, nuclear power,
and/or renewable energy resources, as defined by § 39-26-5(a); provided that:
(i) The electric distribution company may, subject to review and approval of the
commission, select a reasonable, open, and competitive method of soliciting proposals for the
purchase of these power resources, that may include public solicitations and individual
negotiations.
(ii) The solicitation process shall permit a reasonable amount of negotiating discretion for
the parties to engage in arms-length negotiations over final contract terms.
(iii) Each long-term contract entered into pursuant to this section shall contain a condition
that it shall not be effective without commission review and approval.
(iv) The electric distribution company shall file the contract(s) or unsigned contract(s)
pursuant to § 39-31-10(c), along with a justification for its decision, within a reasonable time after
it has executed the contract following a solicitation or negotiation.
(v) Subject to review and approval of the public utilities commission, to enter into long-
term contracts for natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity that are commercially reasonable
and advance the purposes of this chapter at levels beyond those commitments necessary to serve
local gas distribution customers, and may do so either directly, or in coordination with, other New
England states and instrumentalities; utilities; generators; or other appropriate contracting parties.
(vi) The commission shall accept public comment on any contracts filed by the distribution
utility, as authorized under this section, for a period no less than thirty (30) days.
(A) During this public comment period, the contracts shall be reviewed by the following
state agencies, which shall provide advisory opinions to the public utilities commission on the
topics specified, and the public utilities commission shall give due consideration to the advisory
opinions filed:
(I) The department of environmental management (DEM) shall provide an advisory
LC005656 - Page 4 of 10

opinion on the expected greenhouse gas emissions and statewide environmental impacts resulting
from the proposed contract(s), including a determination as to whether the proposed project(s)
advance the goals of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”).
(II) The commerce corporation shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected statewide
economic impacts resulting from the proposed contract(s).
(III) The office of energy resources shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected
energy security, reliability, environmental, and economic impacts resulting from the contract(s).
(B) The commission shall notify the aforementioned agencies upon the filing of any
contract filed by the distribution utility pursuant to this chapter, and notify them of any related
hearings and/or proceedings.
(C) Advisory opinions issued by agencies designated under subsection (a)(1)(vi)(A) of this
section shall not be considered as final decisions of the agencies making the opinions, and shall not
be subject to judicial review under § 42-35-15, or any other provision of the general laws.
(vii) The commission shall approve the contract(s) if it determines that:
(A) The contract is commercially reasonable;
(B) The requirements for the solicitation have been met;
(C) The contract is consistent with achievement of the state’s greenhouse gas reduction
targets as specified in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”); and
(D) The contract is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(viii) Participate in a multistate or regional sharing of costs through the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission-approved tariffs for the costs of electric transmission and natural-gas-
pipeline infrastructure projects pursued under this chapter.
(b) The commission shall hold evidentiary hearings and public hearings to review any
contract filing that may be made pursuant to this section and issue a written order approving or
rejecting the contract within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing; in rejecting a contract,
the commission may advise the parties of the reason for the contract being rejected and provide an
option for the parties to attempt to address the reasons for rejection in a revised contract within a
specified period not to exceed ninety (90) days.
39-31-7. Duties of the commission.
(a) The commission shall approve any proposals made by the electric or gas distribution
company that are commercially reasonable and advance the purposes of this chapter. The
commission’s authority shall include, without limitation, the authority to:
(1) Approve long-term contracts entered into pursuant to the goals and provisions of this
chapter for large-scale hydroelectric power, nuclear power and renewable energy resources, as
LC005656 - Page 5 of 10

defined by § 39-26-5(a);
(2) Approve long-term contracts for natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity
consistent with the purposes of this chapter;
(3) Approve rate-recovery mechanisms proposed by the electric and gas distribution
companies relating to costs incurred under this chapter by the electric and gas distribution company
that facilitate the multistate or regional sharing of costs necessary to implement electric
transmission and natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure projects pursued under this chapter, including
any costs incurred through the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved tariffs related to
such multistate or regional energy infrastructure procurements;
(4) Address any proposed changes to standard-offer procurements, standard-offer pricing,
and retail-choice rules;
(5) Provide for the recovery of reasonable net costs from all distribution customers incurred
by the electric and gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter that may
include, but are not limited to, costs to solicit, evaluate, and seek approval of such contracts as well
as net costs incurred under any contracts approved by the commission under this section and costs
associated with the management of incremental capacity resulting from interstate gas-pipeline-
expansion projects pursued pursuant to this chapter and costs associated with investments in local
gas-distribution-network assets necessary to implement such interstate gas-pipeline-expansion
projects;
(6) Nothing herein is intended to prohibit the commission from allowing the electric
distribution company to use the energy, capacity, and other attributes purchased for resale to
customers and approve tariffs that charge those customers for the energy, capacity, and other
attributes from the resale to those customers; and/or to use the NE-GIS certificates for purposes of
meeting the obligations set forth in chapter 26 of this title (“renewable energy standard”);
(7) Approve cost allocation proposals filed by the gas distribution company and/or the
electric distribution company that appropriately allocate offshore wind costs incurred under § 39-
31-10, natural gas infrastructure and capacity costs incurred under § 39-31-6 between electric and
gas distribution customers of the electric and gas distribution company in a manner proportional to
the energy benefits accrued by Rhode Island’s gas and electric customers from making such
investments. In making its determination, the commission shall consider projected reductions in
regional, wholesale electric prices as a benefit that accrues to electric ratepayers. The allocation of
costs shall include all distribution customers, regardless from whom they are purchasing their
commodity service; and
(8) Approve any other proposed regulatory or ratemaking changes that reasonably advance
LC005656 - Page 6 of 10

the goals set forth herein.
(b) The grant of authorizations under this chapter shall not be construed as creating a
mandate or obligation on the part of the electric and gas distribution company to enter into any
contracts or file any proposals pursuant to this chapter.
(c) The public utilities commission shall docket any proposals made by the office of energy
resources and division of public utilities and carriers pursuant to § 39-31-4. Docket materials shall
be posted and maintained on the commission’s website. The commission shall conduct
proceedings, as provided below, solely for the purpose of determining whether the proposed
infrastructure projects, if implemented, are in the public interest and no commitments shall be valid
or authorized without such finding being made by the commission. The validity and approval of
any commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes
of this chapter shall be separate and subject to § 39-31-5. The docket opened pursuant to this
subsection shall proceed as follows:
(1) The following state agencies shall provide advisory opinions to the commission on the
topics specified below within sixty (60) days from the docketing date:
(i) The department of environmental management (DEM) shall provide an advisory
opinion on the expected greenhouse gas emissions and statewide environmental impacts resulting
from the proposed project(s), including a determination as to whether the proposed project(s)
advance the goals of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”).
(ii) The commerce corporation shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected statewide
economic impacts resulting from the proposed project(s).
(2) The commission shall notify the aforementioned agencies upon the filing of any
proposal made under this section, and notify them of any related hearings and/or proceedings.
(3) Advisory opinions issued by agencies designated under subsection (c)(1) of this section
shall not be considered as final decisions of the agencies making the opinions and shall not be
subject to judicial review under § 42-35-15 or any other provision of the general laws.
(4) Upon completion of the sixty-day (60) advisory-opinion period, the commission shall
provide for a thirty-day (30) public comment period on any energy infrastructure project(s) selected
pursuant to this chapter and hold evidentiary hearings. In addition to evidentiary hearings, the
commission shall also hold at least one public hearing to accept public comment on the proposal(s)
prior to an open meeting held pursuant to this section.
(5) The commission shall hold an open meeting no later than one hundred twenty (120)
days from the date of filing by the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and
carriers and shall certify that the proposed project(s) are in the public interest if, in the commission’s
LC005656 - Page 7 of 10

determination, and in consideration of filed advisory opinions and the opinion of the electric or gas
distribution utility, the proposed infrastructure project(s):
(i) Are consistent with the findings and purposes of this chapter;
(ii) Will benefit Rhode Island by improving local and regional energy system reliability
and security;
(iii) Will benefit Rhode Island ratepayers by offering the potential for reduced energy price
volatility and reduction of energy supply costs in the context of an integrated regional energy
system;
(iv) Will not cause unacceptable harm to the environment and are consistent with the
greenhouse gas reduction goals established in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on Climate”);
and
(v) Will enhance the economic fabric of the state.
(6) The commission shall issue a written determination of its findings within ten (10)
business days of its open-meeting decision and provide copies of that determination, along with
copies of all advisory opinions, public comment, and any other materials deemed relevant to the
commission determination, to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house,
the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and the administrator of the division of public
utilities and carriers.
(d) A determination issued by the commission shall constitute the sole, final, binding, and
determinative regulatory decision within the state for the purpose of authorizing the state to support
a proposed, regional energy-infrastructure project(s) that is funded through the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission approved tariffs on a regional and/or multistate basis pursuant to this
chapter. Appeals shall be governed by § 39-5-1.
(e) Upon issuance of a written determination by the commission finding that the proposed
project(s) is in the public interest, the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and
carriers shall, on behalf of the state, be authorized to support any state, regional, and/or multistate
process necessary to implement the project(s), including, without limitation, supporting any
necessary and related Federal Energy Regulatory Commission filings; provided, however, that any
commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company to implement the proposals remain
voluntary and subject to § 39-31-5.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the electric or gas distribution
company from making a filing under § 39-31-6, simultaneous with a filing under this section by
the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and carriers, in which case the
filings made under §§ 39-31-6 and 39-31-7 shall be consolidated.
LC005656 - Page 8 of 10

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005656
========
LC005656 - Page 9 of 10